da: Bådtrailerens konstruktionstype: Bunk; Bunk/ruller (hybrid); Ruller; Andet
ko: 보트 트레일러 구조 유형: 벙크형; 벙크/롤러(하이브리드); 롤러형; 기타
it: tipo di costruzione del rimorchio per barche: A pattini; A pattini/a rulli (ibrido); A rulli; Altro
pl: Typ konstrukcji przyczepy podłodziowej: Płozowa; Płozowo-rolkowa (hybrydowa); Rolkowa; Inne
es: Tipo de estructura del remolque para embarcaciones: De patines; Patines/rodillos (híbrido); Rodillos; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de construcție al remorcii de ambarcațiuni: Cu traverse; Cu traverse/role (hibrid); Cu role; Altele
ja: ボートトレーラーの構造タイプ: バンク; バンク/ローラー（ハイブリッド）; ローラー; その他
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie vozíka na loď: Lyžinový; Lyžinový/rolňový (hybridný); Rolňový; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de construção de reboque para barco: Berço; Berço/rolete (híbrido); Rolete; Outros
el: Τύπος κατασκευής τρέιλερ σκάφους: Με γλίστρες; Με γλίστρες/ράουλα (υβριδικό); Με ράουλα; Άλλο
cs: Typ konstrukce lodního přívěsu: Ližinové; Ližinové/rolnové (hybridní); Rolnové; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije prikolice za brod: S gredama; S gredama / s valjcima (hibridne); S valjcima; Ostalo
nl: Boottrailer constructietype: Steunbalken; Steunbalken/rollen (hybride); Rollen; Overige
zh-CN: 船用拖车结构类型: 托木式; 托木/滚筒式（混合）; 滚筒式; 其他
hu: Hajószállító utánfutó kialakítási típusa: Párnafás; Párnafás/görgős (hibrid); Görgős; Egyéb
nb: Konstruksjonstype for båthenger: Skliemodell; Sklie/rulle (hybrid); Rullemodell; Annet
de: Bauart des Bootsanhängers: Auflagen; Auflagen/Rollen (Hybrid); Rollen; Sonstige
zh-TW: 船拖車結構類型: 托架式; 托架式/滾輪式 (混合); 滾輪式; 其他
ru: Тип конструкции прицепа для лодки: Ложементный; Ложементно-роликовый (гибридный); Роликовый; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de construção de reboque para barco: Berço; Berço/Rolo (híbrido); Rolo; Outro
fr: Type de support de la remorque de bateau: À patins; À patins/rouleaux (hybride); À rouleaux; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta konstrukcije prikolice za čolne: Sani; Sani/kolesca (hibrid); Kolesca; Drugo
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างของเทรลเลอร์ลากเรือ: ไม้รอง; ไม้รอง/ลูกกลิ้ง (ไฮบริด); ลูกกลิ้ง; อื่นๆ
fi: Venetrailerin rakennetyyppi: Liukukisko; Kisko/rulla (hybridi); Rulla; Muu
en: Boat trailer construction type: Bunk; Bunk/Roller (hybrid); Roller; Other
lt-LT: Valties priekabos konstrukcijos tipas: Su atramomis; Su atramomis / ritinėliais (hibridinė); Su ritinėliais; Kitas
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на ремаркето за лодка: С плъзгачи; С плъзгачи/ролки (хибридна); С ролки; Друго
tr: Tekne römorku yapı tipi: Kızaklı; Kızaklı/tekerlekli (hibrit); Tekerlekli; Diğer
vi: Loại kết cấu rơ moóc thuyền: Dạng thanh đỡ; Thanh đỡ/con lăn (lai); Con lăn; Khác
sv: Konstruktionstyp för båttrailer: Med glidskenor; Glidskenor/rullar (hybrid); Med rullar; Annan